Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4410
Contract to provide child welfare
services; evidence of financial stability and liquidity required; prohibited
acts.

(1)
Any entity seeking to enter into a contract with the Department of Health
and Human Services to provide child welfare services shall provide evidence
of financial stability and liquidity prior to executing such contract.

(2) An entity
contracting with the department to provide child welfare services shall not
require any subcontractor or employee of such contractor or subcontractor
to sign an agreement not to compete with such contractor as a condition of
subcontracting or employment.

Laws 2013, LB269, § 10.